Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-239
Governor; convey property to city of Lincoln.

(1) The Governor is authorized by the Legislature to convey to the city of Lincoln, Nebraska, a permanent easement for the construction, reconstruction, inspection, maintenance, operation, and the replacement of a sanitary sewer, together with all appurtenances, structures, and other applicable equipment pertaining thereto over and through certain real property, situated in the city of Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska, described as follows:

A strip of land forty feet in width through a portion of Lot 75, irregular tract, located in the southwest quarter of section 13, township 10 north, range 6 east of the sixth principal meridian, Lancaster County, Nebraska.

(2) The permanent easement for the sanitary sewer conveyed in this section shall be twenty feet on either side of the centerline described as follows:

Commencing at the intersection with the centerline of Seventeenth Street and the south line of such southwest quarter of section 13, also known as the centerline of Holdrege Street extended; thence north along the centerline of Seventeenth Street, a distance of one hundred nineteen and forty-five hundredths feet to the centerline of the Burlington Northern Railroad right-of-way; thence northeasterly along such centerline a distance of one hundred sixty-four and seventy-six hundredths feet; thence northerly along a line which deflects fifty-six degrees, fifty-three minutes, zero seconds left, a distance of sixty-two and ninety-seven hundredths feet to the point of tangency with a circular curve; thence northerly along the arc of such circular curve bear to the left, whose central angle is thirty-one degrees, four minutes, twenty seconds, whose radius is three hundred thirty and twenty-eight hundredths feet, and whose tangent length is ninety-one and eighty-two hundredths feet, a distance of fifty-three and seventy-nine hundredths feet to the point of beginning; thence continuing along such circular curve, a distance of one hundred twenty-five and thirty-three hundredths feet to the point of tangency with a straight line; thence northwesterly along such straight line, a distance of three hundred four and seventy hundredths feet to the point of tangency with a circular curve; thence northerly along the arc of such circular curve bearing to the right, whose central angle is thirty-one degrees, twenty-nine minutes, zero seconds, whose radius is two hundred feet, and whose tangent length is fifty-six and thirty-seven hundredths feet, a distance of one hundred nine and ninety hundredths feet to the point of tangency with a straight line; thence north along such straight line, a distance of two hundred nine and sixty-one hundredths feet to the point of tangency with a circular curve; thence northwesterly along the arc of such circular curve bearing to the left, whose central angle is forty-five degrees, zero minutes, whose radius is two hundred feet and whose tangent length is eighty-two and eighty-four hundredths feet, a distance of one hundred fifty-seven and eight hundredths feet; thence west along a line which deflects forty-five degrees, zero minutes left from a line tangent to the previously described circular curve, a distance of one hundred thirty-four feet; thence northwesterly along a line which deflects seventy degrees, forty-eight minutes right, a distance of one hundred twenty feet to the point of ending; containing an area of forty-six thousand four hundred twenty-four and eighty hundredths square feet, more or less.

Laws 1984, LB 863, § 1.